Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 23.1 Notification to Farmers

2-23.1-1.
Findings.

The general assembly finds and declares:

That the preservation and expansion of agriculture are goals of the state;

That among economic activities, agriculture is uniquely dependent on the land;

That land use and water usage regulation and land taxation can have significant impacts on the viability of agricultural operations;

That the understanding of such impacts is often not widespread or readily included in decision making; and

That farmers, who have an appreciation of such impacts, may not know in a timely manner that actions are being considered at the local level that could have a direct and significant impact on agricultural operations.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to foster communications between cities and towns and farmers on local actions that have a direct and significant impact on agricultural operations.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-3.
Duties of the department.

The director of the department of environmental management shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. The division of agriculture shall by March 1, 2006, establish a list by city and town of agricultural operations,
as defined in §

2-23-4

, that have a current level II certificate of exemption pursuant to paragraph (32) of §

44-18-30

, and shall provide by April 15, biennially commencing in 2008 to each city and town where such agricultural operations are located, a notification list of such agricultural operations located in whole or in part in the
city or town. The list so established shall only include those agricultural operations that meet the criteria herein set forth and that have applied in writing to be on the list. Applications to be on the list shall be made not later
than December 31, 2005 and every two (2) years thereafter, and shall include the name of the agricultural operations and location, the name and mailing address of the person to receive notification a copy of the certificate of exemption,
and such other information as the department may require to determine whether the criteria set forth in this section have been satisfied.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 271, § 1.

2-23.1-4.
Notification by towns and cities.

Town and city councils shall provide by ordinance for the notification to farmers on the list established by the division of agriculture as provided for in §

2-23.1-3

. Such ordinance shall designate the official or officials responsible for providing the notification and shall provide that not later than seven (7) business days after a matter subject to notification, as provided for
in §

2-23.1-5

, is formally proposed for study or consideration by a public body in which the matter originates, written notification of the matter shall be mailed to said farmers. The written notification shall, as a minimum, state
the matter subject to notification, the public body of the city or town which will be studying or considering the matter, and provide the name of the city or town official, whom one or more of said farmers may contact to request additional
information about the matter or to request a work session as provided for in §

2-23.1-6

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-5.
Matters subject to notification.

Matters subject to notification shall include the following actions to: (a) change the zoning and/or permitted uses of land used for farming; (b) designate or amend the designation of land used for farming in comprehensive plans or land use ordinances;
(c) change the manner taxation of real and personal property used for farming; (d) establish or amend programs for the transfer of development rights affecting farming and hours of operation of machinery and equipment used in farming;
(e) regulate water use for farming purposes; and (f) control noise and hours of operation of machinery and equipment used in farming.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-6.
Work sessions.

Any farmer who receives a notification as provided for in §

2-23.1-4

may request in writing, within ten (10) business days after such notification, a work session to review the impact of the matter subject to notification on farming. The request shall be made to the official designated
on the notification to receive such requests. Within twenty (20) business days after the receipt of such a request, said official shall notify in writing all farmers on the notification list of the request, providing the location,
time and date of a work session on the matter, which shall be not sooner than seven (7) business days after the date of the notice of the said work session. The purpose of the work session shall be to review and consider the effects
of the matter subject to notification on farming. The work session shall be open to the public and shall be prior to any final action on the matter subject to notification by the public body in the city or town in which said matter
originates, and the findings and conclusions of the work session shall be reported to the public body. For any matter subject to notifications not more than one work session shall be deemed to be required by the provisions of this
chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-7.
Emergency actions unimpaired.

The provisions of §§

2-23.1-4

and

2-23.1-6

shall not be deemed to impair, limit, or restrict the power of a public body of a city or town to take emergency actions of a temporary duration that are necessary to protect public health, safety, or welfare.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-8.
Validity of actions.

Except in instances of knowing and willful noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter, a failure to comply strictly with any of the requirements of this chapter shall not be deemed to affect or impair the validity of any action otherwise duly taken.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.

2-23.1-9.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter but shall be confined in its
operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.
P.L. 2005, ch. 314, § 1.